Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 16
CERTIFICATION AND NOTICE
OF SPECIAL DISTRICT TAXES FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION INDEBTEDNESS

32-1-1601. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that special districts are political subdivisions and instrumentalities of the state of Colorado and local governments thereof. The general assembly further finds that defaults in payment of general obligation debts and the possibility of further defaults by some special districts have resulted in a general loss of confidence by investors in bonds and undertakings of all types issued or to be issued by local governments of the state and have imposed severe hardship on investors in general obligation bonds of special districts and upon owners of residential real property within such districts. The general assembly further finds that this part 16 is necessary to protect the credit reputation of local governments of this state, to restore confidence of investors in local government obligations, and to protect owners of residential real property within special districts.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 993, § 2, effective July 1.

32-1-1602. Definitions.

As used in this part 16, unless the context otherwise requires:

"General obligation debt" means an obligation of a special district created by a resolution of the special district authorizing the issuance of bonds or a contract, the obligations of which are backed by a pledge of the full faith and credit of the special district and a covenant to impose mill levies without limit to retire the bonds or fund the contractual obligation.

"Special district" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 32-1-103 (20).

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 994, § 2, effective July 1.

32-1-1603. Separate mill levies - certification to county commissioners.

After July 1, 1992, special districts which levy taxes for payment of general obligation debt shall certify separate mill levies to the board of county commissioners, one each for funding requirements of each such debt in accordance with the relevant contracts or bond resolutions which identifies each bond issue by series, date, coupon rate, and maturity and each contract by title, date, principal amount, and maturity and one for the remainder of the budget of said district.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 994, § 2, effective July 1.

32-1-1604. Recording.

Whenever a special district authorizes or incurs a general obligation debt, a notice of such action and a description of such debt in a form prescribed by the director of the division of local government in the department of local affairs shall be recorded by the special district with the county clerk and recorder in each county in which the district is located. The recording shall be done within thirty days after authorizing or incurring the debt.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 994, § 2, effective July 1.

32-1-1605. Limitations on actions - prior law.

Any claim for relief under section 32-1-1504, as it existed prior to July 1, 1992, shall be commenced on or before January 1, 1993, and not thereafter.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 994, § 2, effective July 1.